Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.054

Disability retirement—Criminal conduct.

A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.32.540, 41.32.550, 41.32.790, or 41.32.880 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

[ 1997 c 103 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 103: See notes following RCW 41.26.061.